Utah statutes.
76-6-511.   Defrauding creditors.
A person is guilty of a class A misdemeanor if:
(1)  he destroys, removes, conceals, encumbers, transfers, or otherwise deals
with property subject to a security interest with a purpose to hinder
enforcement of that interest; or
(2)  knowing that proceedings have been or are about to be instituted for the
appointment of a person entitled to administer property for the benefit of
creditors, he:
(a)  destroys, removes, conceals, encumbers, transfers, or otherwise deals
with any property with a purpose to defeat or obstruct the claim of any
creditor, or otherwise to obstruct the operation of any law relating to
administration of property for the benefit of creditors; or
(b)  presents to any creditor or to an assignee for the benefit of creditors,
orally or in writing, any statement relating to the debtor's estate, knowing
that a material part of such statement is false.
